Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
CHAPTER 150 Fish and Wildlife Resources
150.395.
Prohibition against use of artificial light.

No person or group of persons may deliberately cast the rays of a spotlight or other artificial light into any field, pasture, woodlands, or forest, whether public or private, where wildlife or domestic livestock may reasonably be expected to be located, or into any inhabited building. This section shall not apply to the rays of headlights of vehicles engaged in a normal course of travel; to employees or agents of the department while on official business; to peace officers in the line of duty; to those engaged in legitimate agricultural activities; or to anyone involved in activities legitimate to his business, occupation, or circumstances including lawful hunting and fishing activities, or any landowner, his immediate family, or any paid employee while working on his land at that time.

Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be fined one hundred fifty dollars ($150), which shall be prepayable.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 473, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2000, ch. 168, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

150.398.
Regulations as to traps and trapping. [Repealed.]

150.399.
Traps illegally set or used — Seizure or treatment as contraband.

Any trap set, used, or maintained in violation of the provisions of KRS 150.400 or 150.410 shall be subject to confiscation as contraband under the provisions of KRS 150.120, except that any trap set, used, or maintained without the tag required by subsection (1) of KRS 150.410 is hereby declared contraband and shall be so treated without any order of court so declaring.

History.
Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 52, § 3; 1952, ch. 200, § 53; 1992, ch. 353, § 6, effective July 14, 1992.

150.400.
Traps — Approval — Prohibition — New design.

No person shall set, use or maintain, for the purpose of taking wildlife, any steel trap unless the size and type of the trap has been approved by the commissioner and the commission by regulation.

The commissioner may approve, by regulation, any commercially manufactured trap which is designed to take wildlife alive and unhurt or to kill instantly.

Subject to the provisions of KRS 150.410 it shall be lawful to use snares, deadfalls, wire cage or box traps, but no person shall set, use or maintain a snare large enough to take deer, elk or bear.

Any manufacturer designing a new trap may send a sample to the commissioner for approval or disapproval.

History.
1954d-62a to 1954d-62c: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 41; 1948, ch. 52, § 1; 1952, ch. 200, § 54; 1960, ch. 126; 1986, ch. 265, § 19, effective July 15, 1986.

150.410.
Tagging of traps — Visiting trap line — Protection of domestic animals.

No person shall set, use, or maintain a trap for the purpose of taking wildlife unless there is attached thereto a metal tag giving either the name and address of, or the wildlife identification number as prescribed in administrative regulation that corresponds to, the person setting, using, or maintaining the trap.

Each person who sets a trap for the purpose of taking wildlife shall visit the same at least once every twenty-four (24) hours and remove any wildlife found therein.

No person shall set a trap in such manner as unreasonably to endanger the life or safety of any domestic animal.

History.
1954d-62: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 42; 1948, ch. 52, § 2; 1952, ch. 200, § 55; 1986, ch. 265, § 20, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 365, § 11, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 353, § 7, effective July 14, 1992; 2009, ch. 20, § 4, effective June 25, 2009.

150.411.
Taxidermist’s records — Mounting.

Every licensed taxidermist shall keep a suitable record for five (5) years in which shall be entered the species of each wildlife mounted by him and the name and address of the person for whom the mounting was done.

Any legally taken wildlife may be mounted, provided the wildlife bears identification with the name and address of the owner and date and place taken until such time as it is mounted.

A fish and wildlife disposal permit, signed by a conservation officer, must be attached to wildlife taken other than during a legally open hunting season. Such permit will substitute for the identification required in subsection (2) of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 84, § 18; 1952, ch. 200, § 56; 1978, ch. 178, § 15, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 265, § 21, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 141, § 2, effective July 15, 1988.

150.4111.
Sale of legally taken wildlife.

Any person may sell the inedible parts of any legally taken wildlife to a licensed taxidermist for the purpose of mounting. A licensed taxidermist may buy or sell the inedible parts of any legally taken wildlife for the purpose of mounting, except as otherwise prohibited by federal law. Any person may purchase from or sell to a licensed taxidermist any legally mounted specimen.

Within ten (10) days after the end of each month, a licensed taxidermist shall send to the department a report indicating the number and name of the wildlife of each species which he purchased during the preceding month and the name and address of the person from whom he purchased the wildlife.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 141, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

150.4112.
Administrative regulations to allow resident nonprofit 501(c)(3) institution to sell donated mounted wildlife specimen.

As used in this section, “mounted wildlife specimen” means:

A legally taken animal, including the skin of the head, cape, or the entire skin, mounted in a lifelike representation of the animal or any part thereof; or

A European mount in which the horns or antlers and the skull or a portion of the skull are mounted for display.

Notwithstanding KRS 150.180 and no later than January 1, 2014, the department shall promulgate administrative regulations to allow a resident nonprofit charitable, religious, or educational institution which has qualified for exemption from income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code to sell mounted wildlife specimens, except as prohibited by federal law, that have been donated to that institution.

The administrative regulations promulgated under this section shall establish a means by which each transaction for the sale of donated mounted wildlife specimens for white-tailed deer, elk, bears, turkeys, and bobcats allowed under subsection (2) of this section shall be recorded by the department. The department shall make the recording of each transaction as reasonably convenient for all parties to the transaction as possible, which may include but not be limited to allowing telephone and Internet recording of sales.

Licensed taxidermists subject to the reporting requirements under KRS 150.4111 shall be exempt from the requirements of subsection (3) of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 13, § 1, effective June 25, 2013.

150.4113.
Administrative regulations to allow sale and purchase of mounted wildlife specimens — Recording of sales.

As used in this section, “mounted wildlife specimen” means:

A legally taken animal, including the skin of the head, cape, or the entire skin, mounted in a lifelike representation of the animal or any part thereof; or

A European mount in which the horns or antlers and the skull or a portion of the skull are mounted for display.

Notwithstanding KRS 150.180 and no later than January 1, 2014, the department shall promulgate administrative regulations to allow any person or entity to sell or buy mounted wildlife specimens, except as prohibited by federal law.

The administrative regulations promulgated under this section shall establish a means by which each transaction for the sale of mounted wildlife specimens for white-tailed deer, elk, bears, turkeys, and bobcats shall be recorded by the department. The department shall make the recording of each transaction as reasonably convenient for all parties to the transaction as possible, which may include but not be limited to allowing telephone and Internet recording of sales.

Mounted wildlife specimens purchased from or sold to a licensed taxidermist under KRS 150.4111 shall be exempt from the requirements of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 92, § 1, effective June 25, 2013.

150.412.
Restriction on commercial guide’s participation in taking of wildlife or fish while providing guide services.

While providing the services of a commercial guide, a guide already possessing the applicable sport hunting licenses and permits may participate in the taking of wildlife protected by this chapter up to the bag limit set forth in administrative regulations.

While providing the services of a commercial guide, a guide already possessing the applicable sport fishing licenses and permits may participate in the taking of fish protected by this chapter up to the creel limit set forth in administrative regulations.

History.
Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 84, § 19; 1952, ch. 200, § 57; 1986, ch. 265, § 22, effective July 15, 1986; 2006, ch. 127, § 7, effective July 12, 2006.

150.415.
Fur buyer — Receipts for purchases.

Every licensed fur buyer shall, upon purchasing any raw fur, issue a receipt to the trapper or hunter from whom he has purchased such furs, setting forth the number and kind of furs, the date of the purchase, the price paid for each fur and the license number of the trapper’s or hunter’s license. The buyer shall make out a duplicate receipt at the same time and obtain the signature and address on such duplicate of the trapper or hunter from whom the furs were purchased. Not later than March 15 of each year every licensed fur buyer shall submit to the department a complete report of all furs purchased during the previous buying season. The report shall contain the total number and value of each type of fur purchased. Failure on the part of any buyer to comply with the provisions of this section shall bar the licensee from obtaining a license for the following year.

History.
Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 84, § 20; 1952, ch. 200, § 58.

150.416.
Fur processor — Receipts and inventory.

Every licensed fur processor shall, within fifteen (15) days after January 1 and July 1 of each year file with the department an inventory of furs in his possession as of such dates. Every licensed fur processor shall also issue receipts for the total number of furs purchased from fur buyers, each of which shall show the license number of the fur buyer from whom purchased. Duplicates of such receipts shall be sent to the department with the inventory report.

History.
Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 84, § 21; 1952, ch. 200, § 59.

150.417.
Nonresident accompanying resident fur buyer — Presumption from.

In any prosecution of a nonresident from buying raw fur or furs without a fur buyer’s license, proof that such person was in the company of a resident fur buyer at the time the latter purchased a raw fur shall constitute a prima facie evidence that such nonresident was engaged in the business of buying raw furs without a license.

History.
Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 84, § 22; 1952, ch. 200, § 60.

150.420.
Fur buyer’s license; receipts for furs purchased. [Repealed.]

150.425.
Bounty on beaver.

Upon adoption of a resolution by the fiscal court that beaver exist within the county in such quantities that they present a threat to the preservation of farmland, trees, and other property, the fiscal court may request the department to pay a bounty on beaver. Upon receipt of the resolution, a bounty on beaver of ten dollars ($10) for each beaver shall be paid in the following manner. Upon the presentation of the tail of any beaver, any conservation officer of the department shall issue a receipt, in the form as prescribed by the commission, to the person presenting the tail. The department shall redeem the receipts by paying to such person the sum of ten dollars ($10) for each receipt as bounty. The redemption of receipts shall be paid only from funds especially appropriated for this purpose and it is expressly provided that no bounty shall be paid from any regular receipts, funds, or appropriations of the department. However, the department may charge a maximum of one dollar ($1) against the appropriation for bounties for each bounty paid as reimbursement for the expense of administering the bounty program.

No bounty shall be paid when funds, personnel, or equipment of any governmental unit are used in capturing and killing beaver.

Upon receipt of an adopted resolution from a fiscal court stating that beaver no longer present a threat to property within the county, the department shall cease paying the bounty.

History.
Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 264, § 1, effective June 17, 1978.

150.430.
Purchasing and shipping pelts; license required when. [Repealed.]

150.440.
Open season and creel limits for rough fish.

The open season for taking rough fish by gigging, grabbing, snaring, and snagging shall be prescribed by the department, by regulation.

Creel limits for rough fish taken by gigging, grabbing, snaring, and snagging shall be set by the department, by regulation.

History.
1954d-38, 1954d-42: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 45; 1944, ch. 124, § 11; 1946, ch. 84, § 24; 1948, ch. 78, § 21; 1952, ch. 200, § 61; 1978, ch. 178, § 16, effective June 17, 1978.

150.445.
Fish not to be taken other than by pole and line near dams.

No person shall take fish by any method other than pole and line in hand, for two hundred (200) yards below any dam on or across any stream except as otherwise provided by administrative regulation.

History.
Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 124, § 12; 1946, ch. 84, § 25; 1948, ch. 38, § 1; 1948, ch. 78, § 22; 1952, ch. 200, § 62; 1968, ch. 38, § 22; 1986, ch. 265, § 23, effective July 15, 1986.

150.450.
Use, operation, and possession of certain fishing gear.

The department shall promulgate reasonable regulations governing the taking of minnows and crayfish from the waters of the Commonwealth. The regulations shall prescribe the type of gear to be used, and shall prescribe the types of minnows and crayfish that may be taken and the purposes for which they may be used.

Any person possessing a commercial fishing license may take rough fishes, by the use of commercial fishing gear, the types and specifications of which shall be prescribed by the department by regulation.

No person shall operate any commercial fishing gear as prescribed by regulation unless he has procured a commercial fishing license and a tag for the use of each piece of commercial fishing gear and has complied with the provisions of this chapter or the regulations of the department. The tags shall be affixed to and displayed on each piece of commercial fishing gear in use. This section shall not be construed to require retail or wholesale dealers, or manufacturers to obtain licenses and tags for commercial fishing gear in their possession.

History.
1893d-10, 1954d-40, 1954d-41: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 46; 1944, ch. 124, § 13; 1946, ch. 84, § 26; 1948, ch. 38, § 2; 1952, ch. 200, § 63; 1956, ch. 115, § 18; 1958, ch. 166, § 4; 1968, ch. 38, § 23; 1990, ch. 474, § 8, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 353, § 8, effective July 14, 1992.

150.460.
Use of certain substances and devices in public waters prohibited — Use of explosives and firearms prohibited.

No person, firm or corporation, whether acting in a private or public capacity, shall place or cause to be placed in any public waters any substance that might injure, interfere with, or cause the waters to be unfit for the support of wildlife. When any employee of a person, firm or corporation, in the course of his employment, places or causes to be placed any such substance in any public waters, his act shall be prima facie evidence of the guilt of both the employee and the employer, and either one (1) or both may be punished as provided in subsection (7) of KRS 150.990. Each day that this section is violated shall constitute a separate offense. This section does not apply to employees or agents of the department acting in an official capacity.

No person shall use, or attempt to use any electrical device, fish-finding devices excepted, of any type, such as telephone, or electrical leads from a magneto, or battery, or motor, or any other type of electrical equipment, in any stream or body of water. This does not prevent the authorized employees or agents of the department from using this or any devices in research or investigational work.

No person, except employees or agents of the department, shall willfully place or attempt to place in any of the public waters of the state any substance which has a poisonous or intoxicating effect upon wildlife.

No person shall kill, injure, shock, or stun or attempt to kill, injure, shock, or stun any fishes by any explosive agent, firearm, or other device. This provision shall not apply to employees or agents of the department acting in an official capacity.

History.
1253, 1954d-29, 1954d-38, 1954d-39: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 47; 1944, ch. 124, § 14; 1952, ch. 200, § 64; 1956, ch. 115, § 19; 1968, ch. 38, § 24; 1978, ch. 384, § 37, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 265, § 24, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 365, § 12, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 474, § 9, effective July 13, 1990.

150.470.
Creel and size limits for fish.

No person shall take or have in his or her possession in any one (1) day more fish than the creel limit prescribed in the regulation. The regulation shall also provide the possession limit.

No person shall take or have in his or her possession any fish smaller than the size limit prescribed in the regulation.

History.
1893d-9, 1954d-43: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 48; 1944, ch. 124, § 15; 1946, ch. 84, § 27; 1948, ch. 78, § 23; 1952, ch. 200, § 65.

150.480.
Fish ladders or roads. [Repealed.]

150.485.
Live fish and bait dealers.

No person shall sell live crayfish, mud eels, spring lizards, fish, aquatic invertebrates, or amphibians for bait to be used in taking fishes, nor live fishes for stocking or fishing purposes unless he has obtained a live fish and bait dealer’s license.

History.
Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 50; 1952, ch. 200, § 66; 1968, ch. 38, § 25; 1994, ch. 239, § 7, effective July 15, 1994.

150.490.
License for musseling. [Repealed.]

150.500.
Musseling operations. [Repealed.]

150.510.
Report of musseling operations. [Repealed.]

150.520.
Department may regulate musseling.

The department shall make such requirements by administrative regulations governing the taking, selling, and buying of mussels and the reporting of musseling operations as it may deem best for the proper enforcement of this chapter. To prevent depletion of the mussel beds and to insure proper propagation of the mussels, the department may close any beds to operators at any time and for such length of time as it deems necessary. During such closed season on any bed no one shall take mussels therefrom. When an order is issued closing any mussel bed, due notice of the same shall be published pursuant to KRS Chapter 424.

History.
1954d-49: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 54; 1952, ch. 200, § 69; 1966, ch. 239, § 145; 1988, ch. 365, § 13, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 413, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

150.525.
License for buying mussel shells or mussels in the shell.

No person may engage in the buying of mussel shells or mussels in the shell in this state unless he has in his possession a license authorizing him to do so.

History.
Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 50, § 1(1); 1952, ch. 200, § 70; 1978, ch. 384, § 290, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 365, § 14, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 239, § 8, effective July 15, 1994.

150.530.
Kentucky Sportsmen’s Voluntary Fund. [Repealed.]

150.540.
Special licenses for donations to fund. [Repealed.]

150.550.
Lifetime hunting and fishing licenses. [Repealed.]

150.560.
Fund earmarked; uses. [Repealed.]

150.570.
County clerks to explain purpose of contribution. [Repealed.]

150.580.
Fees to clerks; prizes. [Repealed.]

150.590.
Possession of illegal nets, seines or steel traps; exceptions. [Repealed.]

150.600.
Regulation of the taking of waterfowl.

The commissioner, with the approval of the commission, shall have the authority to regulate the taking of waterfowl within the state and shall further have the power to establish waterfowl refuges and waterfowl shooting grounds, regulate distance of pits and shooting from refuges, either on public or private lands, where hunting or shooting is permitted; to build shooting pits or blinds and make charges for their use; and do anything else necessary to control or improve the conservation or hunting of waterfowl not contrary to federal regulations.

History.
Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 115, § 22; 1972, ch. 43, § 1; 1978, ch. 384, § 38, effective June 17, 1978; 2019 ch. 115, § 8, effective June 27, 2019.

150.603.
Migratory bird/waterfowl permit required — Exceptions — Use of revenue generated by sale of migratory bird/waterfowl permit.

Any person required to possess a hunting license under the provisions of KRS 150.170, except children under sixteen (16) years of age, taking or attempting to take waterfowl within the state shall, in addition to the appropriate hunting license, possess a current migratory bird/waterfowl permit. The permit shall be carried while hunting waterfowl.

Any person required to possess a hunting license under the provisions of KRS 150.170, except children under sixteen (16) years of age, taking or attempting to take migratory shore or upland game birds within the state shall, in addition to the appropriate hunting license, possess a current migratory bird/waterfowl permit. The permit shall be carried while hunting migratory shore or upland game birds.

The Fish and Wildlife Commission shall administer all revenues generated by the sale of the permits. The revenue from the sale of current migratory bird/waterfowl permits shall be expended for waterfowl projects for the purpose of protecting and propagating migratory waterfowl and for the development, restoration, maintenance, and preservation of wetlands within the state. The intent of this section is to expand waterfowl research and management and increase waterfowl populations in the state without detracting from other programs. The expenditures of funds generated under the provisions of this section shall be included in the annual report provided for in KRS 150.061.

History.
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 166, § 1, effective July 1, 1985; 1986, ch. 265, § 25, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 239, § 9, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 268, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 2013, ch. 50, § 2, effective June 25, 2013; 2019 ch. 115, § 9, effective June 27, 2019.

150.605.
Contract for commissioning painting to be used as state waterfowl stamp — Use of revenue from sale of painting. [Repealed.]

150.610.
Issuance of revenue bonds for purpose of establishing public shooting areas, wildlife refuges, public fishing lakes or other projects — Pledging of revenue — Liens.

The commissioner of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources, with approval of the commission, may call for the issuance of revenue bonds pursuant to the entire terms of KRS 58.010 through 58.140 for the purpose of establishing public shooting areas, waterfowl or other wildlife refuges, public fishing lakes or the establishment of other projects of public benefit in the interest of fish and game and may unite into one (1) project for financing purposes all revenue as may be pledged by the commissioner. From every source whatsoever these revenues thus united shall be used for the payment of the principal and interest of all bonds which may be issued. Such united receipts, unless otherwise agreed upon by the commissioner and bonding company, shall continue until all bonds issued have been paid in full. The lien of the bonds from such limited project shall be a lien upon the united gross income and revenue as specified in the original terms ascribed to by the commissioner with the concurrence of the commission.

History.
Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 115, § 25, effective May 18, 1956.

150.620.
Acquisition of lands for establishment and maintenance of public shooting, fishing, and other recreational areas — Operation of facilities and lands — Subleasing of land.

For the purpose of encouraging and developing public interest in wildlife and carrying out the policy of the Commonwealth of Kentucky under KRS Chapter 150, the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources Commission, as a state agency, and based upon investigations and recommendations of the commission, is hereby authorized to acquire lands including any improvements thereon by purchase, condemnation or lease from the State Property and Buildings Commission or from others, and partly by any or all of such means, and to thereafter establish, improve, maintain, and operate public shooting and fishing grounds and similar or related recreational facilities thereon, and for the purpose of paying the cost of any such purchase or condemnation and the maintenance and operation expenses may use and apply any funds available for that purpose. The payments under each such lease shall be deemed an administrative and operating expense of the department, and such payments may be secured by a pledge of and made from all or any part of the funds coming under the control of the department including the game and fish fund, as may be provided and specified in the lease. The commissioner, with the approval of the commission may sublease any lands and improvements thereon acquired under the provisions of this chapter for agricultural and for any purpose deemed by the commission to be incidental or beneficial to the maintenance and operation of the balance of said lands and improvements for the purpose herein stated. The commission may impose and enforce special regulations in the maintenance and operation of the facilities and lands acquired under the provisions of this section or lands that are managed by the department under a cooperative agreement and charge such rates as may be deemed fair and reasonable for the use of and participation of the public in the facilities and lands and lease payments aforesaid may be made a first charge on the income and revenues from the maintenance and operation of the facilities and lands and from the sublease of any portion thereof, to be supplemented with any other funds available for that purpose.

History.
Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 115, § 26, effective May 18, 1956; 1988, ch. 365, § 15, effective July 15, 1988; 2000, ch. 35, § 5, effective July 14, 2000.

150.625.
Highway construction lakes.

The Department of Highways is authorized to construct fills, made necessary by road construction, so that such will impound water.

The Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources and the Department of Highways shall decide whether the creation of a lake in any one (1) particular spot is deemed reasonable and beneficial. The Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources shall do everything necessary to insure good fishing and may regulate boating and other recreational interest so that there may be the least amount of interference.

The Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources may, if the site is suitable, assist the local party or parties in obtaining deeds or easements where necessary. Interested local parties may obtain title to excess land required and deed it to the Commonwealth for creation of a public fishing lake. A parking lot at or near the fill may be created on land deeded free of charge to the Commonwealth.

Surrounding landowners may by permission irrigate from said lake providing that there is no adverse affect on the lake itself.

Parking shall be regulated to prevent obstruction of the highway.

History.
Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 115, effective June 19, 1958.

150.630.
Violations of law pertaining to shooting or hunting preserves — Cancellation or revocation of license.

No person shall violate any law or regulations relating to licensed shooting preserves, or licensed hunting preserves. Any owner or operator who permits any person to hunt on his or her licensed shooting preserve without the required license may have his or her license canceled or revoked by the commissioner of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources.

History.
Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 115, § 20, effective May 18, 1956.

150.640.
Acts of depredation prohibited while hunting, fishing or trapping — Domestic livestock roaming on department lands prohibited.

No person engaged in hunting, fishing or trapping upon either public or private property shall commit any acts of depredation, such as setting of fires, destruction of fences, shooting of livestock or poultry, theft or causing damage to any property in any manner.

No person shall knowingly permit domestic livestock to feed or roam free upon lands owned, licensed or leased by the department except as provided by regulations or authorized by the commissioner.

History.
Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 115, § 21, effective May 18, 1956; 1978, ch. 178, § 17, effective June 17, 1978.

150.645.
Liability of landowner consenting to hunting, fishing, trapping, camping, or hiking on premises — Claims for property damage by state employees participating in wildlife management practices.

An owner, lessee or occupant of premises who gives permission to another person to hunt, fish, trap, camp or hike upon the premises shall owe no duty to keep the premises safe for entry or use by the person or to give warning of any hazardous conditions on the premises, and the owner, lessee, or occupant, by giving his or her permission, does not thereby extend any assurance that the premises are safe for such purpose, or constitute the person to whom permission is granted an invitee to whom a duty of care is owed. The owner, lessee, or occupant giving permission for any of the purposes stated above shall not be liable for any injury to any person or property caused by the negligent acts of any person to whom permission is granted. This section shall not limit the liability which would otherwise exist for willful and malicious failure to guard or to warn against a dangerous condition, use, structure, or activity; or for injury suffered in any case where permission to hunt, fish, trap, camp, or hike was granted for a consideration other than the consideration, if any, as set forth in KRS 411.190(1)(d), paid to said owner, lessee, or occupant by the state. The word “premises” as used in this section includes lands, private ways, and any buildings and structures thereon. Nothing in this section limits in any way any liability which otherwise exists.

Department employees who participate in bona fide wildlife management practices are agents of the department and state and, in the event property damage does occur, a claim for property damages may only be brought in the Board of Claims pursuant to KRS 49.040 to 49.180.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 38, § 29; 1998, ch. 275, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 85, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2017 ch. 74, § 89, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 80, effective June 29, 2021.

150.650.
“Pay lakes” defined. [Repealed.]

150.660.
Establishment of pay lakes, authority of commissioner concerning — Stocking requirement — Permits — Revocation of license.

Any person may establish a pay lake subject to the approval of the commissioner of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources, who shall have the authority to approve or reject the establishment of pay lakes and issue to the owners or lessees of lakes a license for their operation. All pay lakes shall be stocked at least twice per calendar year with not less than five hundred (500) pounds of adult fish per surface acre of water.

When a pay lake is licensed by the department, the commissioner shall issue to the licensee, consecutively numbered permits to be issued, without cost, to pay lake patrons. The permits shall only be valid for fishing any licensed pay lake within the state and shall be valid for one (1) year beginning January 1.

No person, except those exempted elsewhere in this chapter, shall fish in a licensed pay lake without possessing a valid special pay lake permit or a valid statewide fishing license. No owner or operator of a licensed pay lake shall allow any patron to fish who is not properly licensed or permitted.

Any pay lake licensee that fails to comply with the laws or regulations governing the operation of a pay lake may have his operator’s license revoked by the commissioner.

History.
Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 93, § 2, effective May 18, 1956; 1988, ch. 365, § 16, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 353, § 9, effective July 14, 1992.

150.670.
Pay lake permits or regular fishing license required — Exceptions. [Repealed.]

150.680.
Concurrent criminal jurisdiction of portions of Trigg and Lyon Counties within boundaries of Land Between the Lakes ceded to United States.

Kentucky cedes to the United States criminal jurisdiction concurrent with that of Kentucky, solely for the purposes of Section 13 of Title 18 of the United States Code and enforcement proceedings pursuant thereto, over those portions of Trigg and Lyon Counties that lie within the boundaries of the Kentucky portion of Land Between the Lakes and are more specifically described as follows:

Beginning at a point in the Tennessee River at Tennessee River mile 49.2, such being the point of separation between the Kentucky-Tennessee state line and the Trigg County-Calloway County line; thence with the Trigg County-Calloway County line as it meanders northward with the river for a distance of approximately 5.5 miles to a point where the Marshall County-Calloway County line intersects the Trigg County line; thence with the Trigg County-Marshall County line and the river as they meander northward approximately 9 miles to a point where the Trigg County-Lyon County line intersects the Marshall County line; thence with the Lyon County-Marshall County line in a northerly direction to a point in said county line opposite Tennessee River mile 25.7; thence leaving the Lyon County-Marshall County line and running N. 53 deg. 30 min. E. approximately 3,795 feet to U.S. TVA Monument 2CN-6 in the 378-foot contour on the east shore of Kentucky Lake; thence with the 378-foot contour as it meanders northerly to the southwest end of the canal connecting Kentucky Lake and Lake Barkley; thence continuing with the 378-foot contour as it meanders along the southeast shore of the canal in a northeasterly direction to the northeast end of the canal; thence continuing with the 378-foot contour as it meanders eastward and southward to a point where the 378-foot contour intersects the Kentucky-Tennessee state line, said point being located on the west shore of Lake Barkley opposite Cumberland River mile 74.6; thence with the Kentucky-Tennessee state line in a westerly direction for a distance of approximately 8.6 miles to the point of beginning. The combined distance of the calls in the foregoing description that follow the meandering of the 378-foot contour from U.S. TVA Monument 2CN-6 to the Kentucky-Tennessee state line on the west shore of Lake Barkley is approximately 260 miles.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as ceding to the United States any existing legislative or other regulatory jurisdiction of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 43, § 1.

150.690.
Wrongfully entering park and injuring or killing deer, elk or buffalo — Treble damages.

Any person who wrongfully breaks or enters a park or other enclosed grounds used for keeping deer, elk or buffalo, or hunts, drives, chases, takes out, maims or kills any deer, elk or buffalo therein shall, in addition to any other penalty, also pay to the person aggrieved treble the amount of damages sustained.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 49, § 6, effective July 15, 1980.

150.700.
Destroying private fish pond — Treble damages.

Any person who breaks or cuts down, cuts out or destroys any head or dam of any pool, pond, moat, slew, stagnet or pit wherein fish are or will be put or stored by the owner or person in possession, shall, in addition to any other penalty, pay the party aggrieved treble the damages sustained.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 49, § 7, effective July 15, 1980.

150.710.
Intentional obstruction of lawful taking of wildlife.

No person shall intentionally obstruct or disrupt the right of a person to lawfully take wildlife by hunting, trapping, or fishing.

The Attorney General or any person directly affected may bring an action to restrain conduct unlawful under this section and may bring an action to recover damages.

The officers of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources, or any other peace officer, police officer, state police officer, or sheriff may enforce this section.

This section shall not apply to incidental interference with the taking of wildlife by hunting, trapping, or fishing caused by lawful activities including, but not limited to, farming, mining, or recreation.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 81, § 1(1)-(4), effective July 15, 1988.

150.720.
Administrative regulations relating to cervids — Costs resulting from importation of diseased animal.

The Department of Agriculture in cooperation with the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources shall promulgate administrative regulations pertaining to health requirements, eradication of diseases, importation and unique individual identification, including visual identification tags, of privately owned and farm raised cervids maintained for the production of meat and other products. Nothing in this section shall limit the authority of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources to regulate the unique individual identification, including visual identification, of captive cervids that are not privately owned and farm-raised cervids maintained for the production of meat and other products. The Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources, in cooperation with the Department of Agriculture, shall promulgate administrative regulations pertaining to the holding of cervids.

If any person imports a diseased animal into the Commonwealth in violation of the statutes and administrative regulations, then that person shall be responsible to the Department of Agriculture and the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources for all costs incurred in the investigation, response, and eradication of that disease.

History.
Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 88, § 1, effective March 28, 2002; 2009, ch. 62, § 2, effective June 25, 2009.